ja: 砂糖の精製度: ダークブラウン; デメララ; アイシング (粉末); ライトブラウン; マスコバド; 半精製; 未精製; タービナド; 超精製; 精白糖; その他
ko: 설탕 정제 수준: 흑설탕; 데메라라; 아이싱(분말); 황설탕; 머스코바도; 부분 정제; 원당; 터비나도; 초미세 정제; 백설탕; 기타
th: ระดับการกลั่นน้ำตาล: สีน้ำตาลเข้ม; เดเมอเรอรา; ไอซิง (แบบผง); สีน้ำตาลอ่อน; มัสโควาโด; ขัดสีบางส่วน; ไม่ขัดสี; เทอร์บินาโด; ขัดสีพิเศษ; ขาวบริสุทธิ์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Stopnja prečiščenosti sladkorja: Temno rjav; Demerara; V prahu (sladkor v prahu); Svetlo rjav; Muscovado; Delno rafiniran; Surov; Turbinado; Ultra rafiniran; Bel rafiniran; Drugo
it: Livello di raffinazione dello zucchero: Marrone scuro; Demerara; A velo (in polvere); Marrone chiaro; Muscovado; Parzialmente raffinato; Grezzo; Turbinado; Ultra raffinato; Bianco raffinato; Altro
pt-BR: Açúcar nível de refino: Mascavo escuro; Demerara; De confeiteiro (em pó); Mascavo claro; Mascavo; Parcialmente refinado; Bruto; Turbinado; Ultrarrefinado; Branco refinado; Outros
fi: Sokerin jalostusaste: Tummanruskea; Demerara; Tomu; Vaaleanruskea; Muscovado; Osittain puhdistettu; Raaka; Turbinado; Erittäin puhdistettu; Valkoinen puhdistettu; Muu
sv: Socker – raffineringsgrad: Mörkbrunt; Demerara; Florsocker (pulveriserat); Ljusbrunt; Muscovado; Delvis raffinerat; Oraffinerat; Turbinado; Ultraraffinerat; Vitt raffinerat; Övrigt
hr-HR: Razina rafiniranja šećera: Tamnosmeđi; Demerara; U prahu; Svijetlosmeđi; Muscovado; Djelomično rafiniran; Sirovi; Turbinado; Izrazito rafiniran; Bijeli rafinirani; Ostalo
es: Nivel de refinamiento del azúcar: Moreno oscuro; Demerara; Glas (en polvo); Moreno claro; Moscabado; Parcialmente refinado; Crudo; Turbinado; Ultrarrefinado; Blanco refinado; Otro
fr: Degré de raffinage du sucre: Brun foncé; Demerara; Sucre glace; Brun clair; Muscovado; Partiellement raffiné; Brut; Turbinado; Ultra-raffiné; Blanc raffiné; Autre
pt-PT: Nível de refinação do açúcar: Castanho-escuro; Demerara; Em pó (glacé); Castanho-claro; Mascavado; Parcialmente refinado; Bruto; Turbinado; Ultrarrefinado; Branco refinado; Outro
bg-BG: Ниво на рафиниране на захарта: Тъмнокафява; Демерара; Пудра; Светлокафява; Мусковадо; Частично рафинирана; Сурова; Турбинадо; Ултра рафинирана; Бяла рафинирана; Друго
zh-CN: 糖的精炼程度: 深红糖; 德梅拉拉糖; 糖霜（粉末）; 浅红糖; 莫斯科瓦多糖; 部分精炼; 原糖; 粗糖 (Turbinado); 超级精炼; 精制白糖; 其他
cs: Stupeň rafinace cukru: Tmavě hnědý; Demerara; Moučkový (pudrový); Světle hnědý; Muscovado; Částečně rafinovaný; Surový; Turbinado; Vysoce rafinovaný; Bílý rafinovaný; Jiné
da: Sukkerraffineringsniveau: Mørkebrun; Demerara; Flormelis; Lysebrun; Muscovado; Delvist raffineret; Rå; Turbinado; Ultra-raffineret; Hvid, raffineret; Andet
de: Zuckerraffinierungsgrad: Dunkelbraun; Demerara; Puderzucker; Hellbraun; Muscovado; Teilraffiniert; Roh; Turbinado; Ultraraffiniert; Weiß raffiniert; Sonstige
vi: Mức độ tinh chế đường: Nâu đậm; Demerara; Đường bột; Nâu nhạt; Muscovado; Tinh luyện một phần; Thô; Turbinado; Siêu tinh luyện; Trắng tinh luyện; Khác
zh-TW: 糖精煉程度: 深色紅糖; 德麥拉拉蔗糖; 糖霜 (糖粉); 淺紅糖; 馬斯科瓦多糖; 部分精煉; 粗糖; 粗製蔗糖; 超精煉; 精白糖; 其他
tr: Şekerin rafinasyon seviyesi: Koyu kahverengi; Demerara; Pudra; Açık kahverengi; Muscovado; Kısmen rafine; Ham; Turbinado; Ultra rafine; Beyaz rafine; Diğer
nb: Sukkerraffineringsnivå: Mørkebrun; Demerara; Melis; Lysebrun; Muscovado; Delvis raffinert; Rå; Turbinado; Ultraraffinert; Hvit raffinert; Annet
en: Sugar refinement level: Dark brown; Demerara; Icing (powdered); Light brown; Muscovado; Partially refined; Raw; Turbinado; Ultra refined; White refined; Other
nl: Suiker raffinageniveau: Donkerbruin; Demerara; Poeder; Lichtbruin; Muscovado; Gedeeltelijk geraffineerd; Ruw; Turbinado; Ultrageraffineerd; Wit geraffineerd; Overig
ru: Степень рафинирования сахара: Темно-коричневый; Демерара; Сахарная пудра; Светло-коричневый; Мусковадо; Частично рафинированный; Сахар-сырец; Турбинадо; Ультрарафинированный; Белый рафинированный; Другой
lt-LT: Cukraus rafinavimo lygis: Tamsiai rudas; Demerara; Cukraus pudra; Šviesiai rudas; Muskovado; Iš dalies rafinuotas; Nerafinuotas (žalias); Turbinado; Itin rafinuotas; Baltasis rafinuotas; Kitas
ro-RO: Nivelul de rafinare a zahărului: Brun închis; Demerara; Pudră; Brun deschis; Muscovado; Parțial rafinat; Brut; Turbinado; Ultra-rafinat; Alb rafinat; Altele
sk-SK: Stupeň rafinácie cukru: Tmavohnedý; Demerara; Práškový; Svetlohnedý; Muscovado; Čiastočne rafinovaný; Surový (nerafinovaný); Turbinado; Vysoko rafinovaný; Biely rafinovaný; Iné
hu: Cukorfinomítási szint: Sötétbarna; Demerara; Porcukor; Világosbarna; Muscovado; Részben finomított; Nyers; Turbinado; Ultrafinomított; Fehér, finomított; Egyéb
pl: Poziom rafinacji cukru: Ciemnobrązowy; Demerara; Cukier puder; Jasnobrązowy; Muscovado; Częściowo rafinowany; Surowy; Turbinado; Ultra rafinowany; Biały rafinowany; Inny
el: Βαθμός επεξεργασίας ζάχαρης: Σκούρα καστανή; Ντεμεράρα; Άχνη; Ανοιχτή καστανή; Μοσχοβάδο; Μερικώς ραφιναρισμένη; Ακατέργαστη; Τουρμπινάντο; Εξαιρετικά ραφιναρισμένη; Λευκή ραφιναρισμένη; Άλλο